ja: ワイヤレス充電規格: AirFuel; MagSafe; なし; PMA; パワーマット; 独自の; Qi; Qi2; その他
el: Πρότυπο ασύρματης φόρτισης: AirFuel; MagSafe; Καμία; PMA; Powermat; Ιδιοταγής; Qi; Qi2; Άλλο
fr: Norme de chargement sans fil: AirFuel; MagSafe; Aucune; PMA; Powermat; Propriétaire; Qi; Qi2; Autre
ro-RO: Standard de încărcare fără fir: AirFuel; MagSafe; Niciuna; PMA; Powermat; Proprietate; Qi; Qi2; Altele
zh-CN: 无线充电标准: AirFuel; MagSafe; 无; PMA; Powermat; 专有标准; Qi; Qi2; 其他
da: Trådløs opladningsstandard: AirFuel; MagSafe; Ingen; PMA; Powermat; Navnebeskyttet; Qi; Qi2; Andet
pt-BR: Padrão de carregamento sem fio: AirFuel; MagSafe; Nenhum; PMA; Powermat; Proprietário; Qi; Qi2; Outro
cs: Standard bezdrátového nabíjení: AirFuel; MagSafe; Žádný; PMA; Powermat; Vlastní; Qi; Qi2; Jiné
ko: 무선 충전 표준: AirFuel; MagSafe; 없음; PMA; Powermat; 독점; Qi; Qi2; 기타
hu: Vezeték nélküli töltési szabvány: AirFuel; MagSafe; Egyik sem; PMA; Powermat; Szabadalmazott; Qi; Qi2; Egyéb
de: Kabelloser Ladestandard: AirFuel; MagSafe; Keine; PMA; Powermat; Proprietär; Qi; Qi2; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Standard bežičnog punjenja: AirFuel; MagSafe; Nema; PMA; Powermat; Vlasnički; Qi; Qi2; Ostalo
nb: Trådløs ladestandard: AirFuel; MagSafe; Ingen; PMA; Powermat; Privateid; Qi; Qi2; Annet
nl: Standaard voor draadloos opladen: AirFuel; MagSafe; Geen; PMA; Powermat; Eigendom; Qi; Qi2; Andere
ru: Стандарт беспроводной зарядки: AirFuel; MagSafe; Нет; PMA; Powermat; Фирменный; Qi; Qi2; Другой
lt-LT: Belaidžio įkrovimo standartas: „AirFuel“; „MagSafe“; Nėra; PMA; „Powermat“; Patentuotas; Qi; Qi2; Kita
sv: Trådlös laddningsstandard: AirFuel; MagSafe; Inga; PMA; Powermat; Proprietär; Qi; Qi2; Övrigt
sl-SI: Standard brezžičnega polnjenja: AirFuel; MagSafe; Brez; PMA; Powermat; Lastniški standard; Qi; Qi2; Drugo
tr: Kablosuz şarj standardı: AirFuel; MagSafe; Hiçbiri; PMA; Güç matı; Tescilli; Qi; Qi2; Diğer
es: Estándar de carga inalámbrica: AirFuel; MagSafe; Ninguno; PMA; Powermat; Patentado; Qi; Qi2; Otros
en: Wireless charging standard: AirFuel; MagSafe; None; PMA; Powermat; Proprietary; Qi; Qi2; Other
vi: Tiêu chuẩn sạc không dây: AirFuel; MagSafe; Không có; PMA; Powermat; Độc quyền; Qi; Qi2; Khác
sk-SK: Štandard bezdrôtového nabíjania: AirFuel; MagSafe; Žiadny; PMA; Powermat; Vlastnícke; Qi; Qi2; Iné
zh-TW: 無線充電標準: AirFuel; MagSafe; 無; PMA; 無線充電板; 專用; Qi; Qi2; 其他
pt-PT: Padrão de carregamento sem fios: AirFuel; MagSafe; Nenhum; PMA; Powermat; Proprietário; Qi; Qi2; Outro
bg-BG: Стандарт за безжично зареждане: AirFuel; MagSafe; Няма; PMA; Powermat; Собствено; Qi; Qi2; Други
th: มาตรฐานการชาร์จแบบไร้สาย: AirFuel; MagSafe; ไม่มี; PMA; Powermat; กรรมสิทธิ์; Qi; Qi2; อื่นๆ
it: Standard di ricarica wireless: AirFuel; MagSafe; Nessuna; PMA; Powermat; Proprietario; Qi; Qi2; Altro
pl: Standard ładowania bezprzewodowego: AirFuel; MagSafe; Brak; PMA; Powermat; Własny; Qi; Qi2; Inne
fi: Langattoman latauksen standardi: AirFuel; MagSafe; Ei mitään; PMA; Powermat; Valmistajakohtainen; Qi; Qi2; Muu